Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-153. Court files and records — Inspection limited — Exceptions for certain violent offenders — Confidentiality — Expunction.

Except in cases arising under § 37-1-146, all files and records of the court in a proceeding under this part are open to inspection only by:

The judge, officers and professional staff of the court;

The parties to the proceeding and their counsel and representatives;

A public or private agency or institution providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the court;

A court and its probation and other officials or professional staff and the attorney for the defendant for use in preparing a presentence report in a criminal case in which the defendant is convicted and who prior thereto had been a party to the proceeding in juvenile court; and

With permission of the court, any other person or agency or institution having a legitimate interest in the proceeding or in the work of the court.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), petitions and orders of the court in a delinquency proceeding under this part shall be opened to public inspection and their content subject to disclosure to the public if:

The juvenile is fourteen (14) years of age or older at the time of the alleged act; and

The conduct constituting the delinquent act, if committed by an adult, would constitute first degree murder, second degree murder, rape, aggravated rape, aggravated sexual battery, rape of a child, aggravated rape of a child, aggravated robbery, especially aggravated robbery, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, or especially aggravated kidnapping; or

The conduct constituting the delinquent act, if committed by an adult, would constitute an act of terrorism, as defined by § 39-13-803, or an attempt to commit an act of terrorism.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a court file or record contains any documents other than petitions and orders, including, but not limited to, a medical report, psychological evaluation or any other document, such document or record shall remain confidential.

Except as otherwise permitted in this section, it is an offense for a person to intentionally disclose or disseminate to the public the files and records of the juvenile court, including the child's name and address.

A violation of this subsection (d) shall be punished as criminal contempt of court as otherwise authorized by law.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, where notice is required under § 49-6-3051, an abstract of the appropriate adjudication contained in the court file or record shall be made and provided to the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the juvenile, including the department, and this abstract shall be presented to the school in which the juvenile is, or may be, enrolled, in compliance with § 49-6-3051.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person who is tried and adjudicated delinquent or unruly by a juvenile court may subsequently file a motion for expunction of all court files and the juvenile records. The court may order all or any portion of the requested expunction if, by clear and convincing evidence, the court finds that the movant:

Is currently seventeen (17) years of age or older;

Is at least one (1) year removed from the person's most recent delinquency or unruly adjudication;

Has never been convicted of a criminal offense as an adult, has never been convicted of a criminal offense following transfer from juvenile court pursuant to § 37-1-134, and has never been convicted of a sexual offense as defined in § 40-39-202, whether in juvenile court, following transfer from juvenile court pursuant to § 37-1-134, or as an adult;

Does not have an adjudication of delinquency for a violent juvenile sexual offense as defined in § 40-39-202; and

Does not have an adjudication of delinquency for a delinquent act that if committed by an adult, would constitute an act of terrorism, as defined by § 39-13-803, or an attempt to commit an act of terrorism;

Has maintained a consistent and exemplary pattern of responsible, productive and civic-minded conduct for one (1) or more years immediately preceding the filing of the expunction motion; or

Has made such an adjustment of circumstances that the court, in its discretion, believes that expunction serves the best interest of the child and the community.

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to apply to any law enforcement records, files, fingerprints or photographs pertaining to any delinquency or unruly adjudication.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(13), in any case in which there is successful completion of an informal adjustment without adjudication under § 37-1-110, the juvenile records shall be expunged by the juvenile court after one (1) year, upon the filing of a motion for expunction and without cost to the child. The court shall inform the child, at the time of the informal adjustment, of the need to file the motion for expunction after a year of successful completion of an informal adjustment and provide the child with a model expunction motion prepared by the administrative office of the courts. The administrative office of the courts shall create a motion that can be completed by a child and shall be circulated to all juvenile court clerks. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction motion accessible to all movants.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(13), in any case in which there is a successful completion of a pretrial diversion pursuant to § 37-1-110, the juvenile record shall be expunged by the juvenile court after one (1) year, upon the filing of a motion for expunction and without cost to the child. The court shall inform the child, at the time of the pretrial diversion, of the need to file the motion for expunction after a year of successful completion of the pretrial diversion and provide the child with a model expunction motion prepared by the administrative office of the courts. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction motion accessible to all movants.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(13), in any case in which there is a successful completion of a judicial diversion pursuant to § 37-1-129, the juvenile record shall be expunged by the juvenile court after one (1) year, upon the filing of a motion for expunction and without cost to the child. The court shall inform the child, at the time of the judicial diversion, of the need to file the motion for expunction after a year of successful completion of the judicial diversion and provide the child with a model expunction motion prepared by the administrative office of the courts. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction motion accessible to all movants.

In any case that is dismissed, excluding a case dismissed after successful completion of an informal adjustment, pretrial diversion, or judicial diversion, the juvenile record shall be expunged by the juvenile court as a part of the court's order of dismissal, without the filing of a pleading for expunction, and at no cost to the child.

A motion for expunction may be filed prior to the one-year period outlined in subdivisions (f)(3), (f)(4), and (f)(5). If the motion is filed, the court may order all or any portion of the requested expunction if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the movant has successfully completed the informal adjustment or diversion and has made such an adjustment of circumstances that the court, in its discretion, determines that expunction serves the best interest of the child and the community.

In any case in which a child's juvenile record contains convictions solely for unruly adjudications or delinquency adjudications for offenses that would be misdemeanors if committed by an adult, the juvenile court shall expunge all court files and records after one (1) year from the child's completion of and discharge from any probation or conditions of supervision, upon the filing of a motion by the child. The court shall inform the child, at the time of adjudication, of the need to file a motion to expunge after a year from the successful completion of probation and provide the child with a model expunction motion prepared by the administrative office of the courts. The administrative office of the courts shall create a motion that can be completed by a child and shall circulate the motion to all juvenile court clerks. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction motion accessible to all children. (9) The order of expunction, the original delinquent or unruly petition, and the order of adjudication and disposition under subdivisions (f)(1)-(8) shall be sealed and maintained by the clerk of the court in a locked file cabinet and kept separate from all other records. In courts that maintain a case management system capable of expunging a record and only allowing access to the system administrator, paper copies need not be maintained. The sealed orders and petition shall not be released to anyone except at the written request of the person whose records are expunged or in response to an order of a court with proper jurisdiction. Any person whose records are expunged under subdivisions (f)(1)-(8) shall be restored to the status that the person occupied before arrest, citation, the filing of a juvenile petition, or referral. Once a person's juvenile record is expunged, the person shall not be held criminally liable under any provision of state law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of the person's failure to recite or acknowledge such record or arrest in response to any inquiry made of the person for any purpose.

The juvenile is tried and adjudicated delinquent or unruly by a juvenile court for conduct that would constitute the offense of prostitution under § 39-13-513 or aggravated prostitution under § 39-13-516 if committed by an adult;

The court finds that the conduct upon which the adjudication is based was found to have occurred as a result of the person being a victim of human trafficking under § 39-13-314; and

The juvenile has filed a motion for expunction of all court files and juvenile records.

A juvenile court shall not expunge a juvenile record following successful completion of an informal adjustment under §37-1-110, pretrial diversion under §37-1-110, or judicial diversion under §37-1-129, if the child was accused of a delinquent act that if committed by an adult, would constitute an act of terrorism, as defined by §39-13-803, or an attempt to commit an act of terrorism.

For purposes of this subsection (f), a juvenile record includes all documents, reports, and information received, kept, or maintained in any form, including electronic, by the juvenile court clerk or juvenile court staff relating to a delinquency or unruly case, with the exception of assessment reports under §37-1-136.

The court shall inform the child, at the time of adjudication, of the need to file a motion to expunge the child's juvenile record. The administrative office of the courts shall create a motion that can be completed by a child and shall be circulated to all juvenile court clerks. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction motion accessible to all children.

The court may order all or any portion of a juvenile's court files and juvenile records expunged if:

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 51; T.C.A., § 37-251; Acts 1994, ch. 998, § 1; 1999, ch. 366, § 1; 2003, ch. 238, § 2; 2005, ch. 265, § 4; 2005, ch. 412, § 1; 2007, ch. 552, § 1; 2011, ch. 483, § 2; 2016, ch. 1017, §§ 1-4; 2017, ch. 196, § 1; 2017, ch. 197, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 199, §§ 1-6; 2018, ch. 1018, § 1; 2019, ch. 177, § 1; 2020, ch. 806, §§ 2-5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1018, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to motions filed on or after July 1, 2018.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (f), inserted “or unruly” in the first sentence of the introductory language, substituted “delinquency or unruly adjudication” for “delinquency adjudication” in (1)(A)(ii) and (2); and added (3) and (4).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 196 added (f)(11).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 197, in (f), substituted “ seventeen (17) years of age or older” for “eighteen (18) years of age or older” at the end of (1)(A)(i); and added (f)(8).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 199, in the introductory language of (f)(1), substituted “file a motion” for petition the juvenile court” and inserted “the juvenile” preceding “records” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “movant” for “petitioner” in the second sentence; in (f)(1)(A), deleted the word “and” at the end of (f)(1)(A)(ii) and added it at the end of (f)(1)(A)(iii); in (f)(1)(B), substituted “motion” for “petition”; in (f)(1)(C), substituted “Has” for “The juvenile had”; rewrote (f)(3) and (4), which read:“(3)(A) In any case in which there is successful completion of an informal adjustment without adjudication under §37-1-110, all court files and records shall be expunged by the juvenile court after one (1) year, upon a petition by the child pursuant to §40-32-101(a), and without cost to the child. The court shall inform the child, at the time of the informal adjustment, of the need to petition for expunction after a year of successful completion of an informal adjustment and provide the child with a model expunction petition prepared by the administrative office of the courts. The administrative office of the courts shall create a petition that can be completed by a child and shall be circulated to all juvenile court clerks. All juvenile court clerks shall make this model expunction petition accessible to all petitioners.“(B) In any case that is dismissed, excluding a case dismissed after successful completion of an informal adjustment, all court files and records shall be expunged by the juvenile court as a part of the court's order of dismissal, without the filing of a petition for expunction, and at no cost to the child. In any case that is dismissed, excluding a case dismissed after successful completion of an informal adjustment, all court files and records shall be expunged by the juvenile court as a part of the court's order of dismissal, without the filing of a petition for expunction, and at no cost to the child.“(4) Any person whose records are expunged under subdivisions (f)(1)–(3) shall be restored to the status that the person occupied before arrest, citation, the filing of a juvenile petition, or referral.”;and added (f)(5) through (7), (9), and (10).

The 2018 amendment added (f)(12).

The 2019 amendment, inserted “aggravated sexual battery,” immediately following “aggravated rape,” in (b)(2).

The 2020 amendment redesignated former (b)(1) and (2) as present (b)(1)(A) and (B); in (b)(1)(A), deleted “or more” preceding “years of age” and inserted “or older”; added present (b)(2); added (f)(1)(A)(v) and (f)(13); and in (f)(3) – (f)(5), added “Except as provided in subdivision (f)(13),”.

Effective Dates. Act 2016, ch. 1017, § 5. April 28, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 196, § 2. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 197, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 199, § 9. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1018, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 177, § 2. April 23, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 806, § 6. October 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Attorney General Opinions. The media does not have a legitimate interest in juvenile court proceedings such that they have the right to inspect juvenile court records and files that are otherwise protected as confidential by T.C.A. §37-1-153(a)(5), since the media's interest in confidential juvenile court records and files as a source of potentially newsworthy information does not qualify as a legitimate interest, OAG 00-128 (8/10/00).

Construction of statutes requiring notification of the school when a student has been found delinquent by virtue of committing certain offenses, OAG 07-127, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (8/27/07).

Juvenile court official's providing copies of civil petitions alleging child abuse to district attorneys general. OAG 10-124, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 130 (12/30/10).

Under T.C.A. §37-1-153(b), a judge, member of the court's staff, or clerk would not be prohibited from initiating disclosure of the offenses listed in (b)(2) if the offenses are identified in the pertinent petitions and orders that are open to public inspection. OAG 13-10, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/13/13).

37-1-154. Law enforcement records — Inspection limited — Exceptions for certain violent offenders.

Unless a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under § 37-1-134, the interest of national security requires or the court otherwise orders in the interest of the child, the law enforcement records and files shall not be open to public inspection or their contents disclosed to the public; but inspection of the records and files is permitted by:

A juvenile court having the child before it in any proceeding;

Counsel for a party to the proceeding;

The officers of public institutions or agencies to whom the child is committed;

Law enforcement officers of other jurisdictions when necessary for the discharge of their official duties; and

A court in which such child is convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of a presentence report or other dispositional proceeding, or by officials of penal institutions and other penal facilities to which such child is committed, or by a parole board in considering such child's parole or discharge or in exercising supervision over such child.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), petitions and orders of the court in a delinquency proceeding under this part shall be opened to public inspection and their content subject to disclosure to the public if:

The juvenile is fourteen (14) years of age or older at the time of the alleged act; and

The conduct constituting the delinquent act, if committed by an adult, would constitute first degree murder, second degree murder, rape, aggravated rape, aggravated sexual battery, rape of a child, aggravated rape of a child, aggravated robbery, especially aggravated robbery, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, or especially aggravated kidnapping; or

The conduct constituting the delinquent act, if committed by an adult, would constitute an act of terrorism, as defined by § 39-13-803, or an attempt to commit an act of terrorism.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a court file or record contains any documents other than petitions and orders, including, but not limited to, a medical report, psychological evaluation or any other document, such document or record shall remain confidential.

Except as otherwise permitted in this section, it is an offense for a person to intentionally disclose or disseminate to the public the law enforcement records concerning a charge of delinquency, including the child's name and address.

A violation of this subsection (d) shall be punished as criminal contempt of court as otherwise authorized by law.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, where notice is required under § 49-6-3051, an abstract of the appropriate adjudication contained in the court file or record shall be made and provided to the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the juvenile, including the department, and this abstract shall be presented to the school in which the juvenile is, or may be, enrolled, in compliance with § 49-6-3051.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 52; T.C.A., § 37-252; Acts 1994, ch. 998, § 1; 1999, ch. 366, § 2; 2003, ch. 238, § 3; 2005, ch. 265, § 5; 2020, ch. 806, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment redesignated former (b)(1) and (2) as present (b)(1)(A) and (B); in (b)(1)(B), inserted “aggravated sexual battery,” and “aggravated rape of a child,”; and added present (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 806, § 6. October 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Contempt, title 29, ch. 9; Tenn. R. Crim. P. 42.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 14 of the Rules of the Tennessee Court of Appeals.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Attorney General Opinions. Construction of statutes requiring notification of the school when a student has been found delinquent by virtue of committing certain offenses, OAG 07-127, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (8/27/07).

A city/county school, university or college would not be prohibited by FERPA or HIPAA from sharing criminal incident report data with law enforcement. Law enforcement officers and juvenile courts may share information regarding minor children when necessary for the discharge of their official duties. OAG 10-70, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/21/10).

37-1-155. Fingerprints and photographs — Use — When destroyed — Video and audio recordings.

No child shall be fingerprinted or photographed in the investigation of delinquent acts without the permission of the court, unless the child is charged with a delinquent act that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony, in which case the child shall be fingerprinted and photographed at the time the child is taken into custody and such fingerprint file may be maintained in an automated fingerprint identification system. Such fingerprint file and photograph shall only be accessible to law enforcement officers, except as provided in § 37-1-154, and shall be maintained separate and apart from adult fingerprint files. The custody and maintenance of those fingerprints and photographs shall be the responsibility of the agency taking the child into custody.

Law enforcement agencies shall not disclose such fingerprint or photograph files, except as permitted under § 37-1-154.

Fingerprint and photograph records shall be destroyed:

If the child is charged with a misdemeanor offense and is not adjudicated a delinquent child; or

If a petition alleging delinquency is not filed or the case is transferred to the juvenile court as provided in § 37-1-109.

If the child is charged with a felony and is not adjudicated a delinquent child, the fingerprint and photograph records shall be maintained until the subject reaches eighteen (18) years of age. The record is then subject to expunction at the direction of the court.

If the child is adjudicated a delinquent child on a felony offense, the fingerprint and photograph records shall be maintained permanently.

If the child is adjudicated a delinquent child on a misdemeanor offense, the fingerprint and photograph records shall be maintained until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age, or permanently if the child was fourteen (14) years of age or older when the offense was committed.

All fingerprint and photograph records maintained pursuant to the authority of this section shall be confidential and used for law enforcement purposes only, or as otherwise permitted by law.

If latent fingerprints are found during the investigation of an offense and a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that they are those of a particular child, such officer may fingerprint the child regardless of age or offense for purposes of immediate comparison with the latent fingerprints. If the comparison is negative, the fingerprint card and other copies of the fingerprints taken shall be immediately destroyed. If the child is not referred to the court or the case is dismissed, the fingerprints shall be immediately destroyed.

If during the investigation of an offense, a law enforcement officer receives a description of the offender and such law enforcement officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that the description is that of a particular child, such officer may photograph the child regardless of age or offense for purposes of identification. However, nothing in this subsection (d) shall be deemed as authorizing an unconstitutional seizure of a child for purposes of obtaining a photograph.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer, while acting in the course of official duties, may photograph, make a video recording or make an audio recording of a juvenile in the following circumstances:

The juvenile is in the process of committing an offense;

The law enforcement officer is conducting field sobriety tests based upon suspicion that the juvenile is driving under the influence of an intoxicant; or

The juvenile is the victim of an offense and consents to photographing or recording. However, any photograph or recording of the victim taken pursuant to this subdivision (e)(1)(C) shall be taken solely for use as evidence in the case being investigated and not for any other purpose except as is already provided in this section.

The photograph or recording shall be made solely for use as evidence, and if no charges are brought against the juvenile within the applicable statute of limitations for the offense under investigation, the photograph or recording shall be destroyed unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders otherwise.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the photograph or recording shall not be considered a public record and shall not be released to the public except by order of the court having jurisdiction over the charges brought against the juvenile.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 53; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-253; Acts 1993, ch. 363, § 1; 1994, ch. 748, § 1; 2007, ch. 134, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 20.50.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VI. Juvenile Courts (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 469 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. §37-1-155(a)(1), law enforcement is prohibited from videotaping or digitally recording juveniles while performing field sobriety tests, OAG 06-107 (7/5/06).

37-1-156. Contributing to delinquency — Penalty — Jurisdiction of court.

Any adult who contributes to or encourages the delinquency or unruly behavior of a child, whether by aiding or abetting or encouraging the child in the commission of an act of delinquency or unruly conduct or by participating as a principal with the child in an act of delinquency, unruly conduct or by aiding the child in concealing an act of delinquency or unruly conduct following its commission, commits a Class A misdemeanor, triable in the circuit or criminal court.

An adult convicted of a violation of this section shall be sentenced to the county jail or workhouse to serve one hundred percent (100%) of the maximum authorized sentence for a Class A misdemeanor if:

The adult's conduct constituting a violation of this section involves supplying, giving, furnishing, selling, or permitting a child to buy or obtain, a product or substance that is unlawful for the child to possess; and

As a proximate result of the product or substance, the child engages in conduct that causes the death of another.

When any juvenile judge shall have reasonable ground to believe that any person is guilty of having contributed to the delinquency or unruly conduct of a child, such judge shall cause the person to be arrested and brought before such judge. In such case, when the defendant pleads not guilty, the juvenile court judge has the power to bind the defendant over to the grand jury or to proceed to hear the case on its merits without the intervention of a jury if the defendant requests the hearing in juvenile court and expressly waives in writing an indictment, presentment, grand jury investigation and jury trial. In the event the defendant enters a plea of guilty, the juvenile court judge has the same power as the circuit or criminal court in making final disposition of the case.

If a child is found delinquent a second or subsequent time for conduct that constitutes the offense of vandalism under § 39-14-408, and the property vandalized is owned, operated, maintained or used by a governmental or other public entity, the parent or legal guardian of that child is in violation of this section.

It is a defense to a violation of this subsection (c) if the parent or guardian demonstrates to the court that all reasonable means available were taken to prevent the child from engaging in the prohibited conduct.

In lieu of the punishment prescribed in subsection (a), if the court finds that the parent or guardian of the delinquent child is in violation of this subsection (c), it may order the parent or guardian to repair, repaint, clean, refurbish or replace the property damaged as a result of the vandalism. If the damage does not lend itself to repair or cleaning, or if there is a legitimate reason why the parent or guardian is unable to do so, the court, in its discretion, may allow the parent or guardian to pay to have the damage repaired or replaced. If the parent or guardian is indigent and cannot afford to replace the damaged property, the court shall order the indigent parent or guardian to perform other community service work for which the parent or guardian is better suited.

A violation of this subsection (c) may be heard and determined by the juvenile court.

As a dispositional option for the delinquent act of vandalism, the court may also require the child responsible for the vandalism to assist in the repair or cleaning of the damage along with the child's parent or guardian.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 54; T.C.A., § 37-254; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2007, ch. 353, § 1; 2010, ch. 1116, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1116, § 1 provided that the act, which added subdivision (a)(2), shall be known and may be cited as the “Markie Voyles Act.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, § 21, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Limitations on State Power to Hold Parents Criminally Liable for the Delinquent Acts of Their Children, 44 Vand. L. Rev. 441.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction of juvenile courts over misdemeanors of child abuse and neglect and contributing to delinquency, OAG 93-24 (3/29/93).

37-1-157. Contributing to dependency — Penalties — Jurisdiction of court.

When any child is alleged to be a dependent and neglected child, the parent, guardian or other person who by any willful act causes, contributes to or encourages such dependency and neglect commits a Class A misdemeanor, triable in the circuit or criminal court.

In such a case when the defendant pleads not guilty, the juvenile court judge has the power to bind the defendant over to the grand jury as in cases of misdemeanors under the criminal laws of this state. In such case, when the defendant pleads not guilty, the juvenile court judge has the power to bind the defendant over to the grand jury or to proceed to hear the case on its merits without the intervention of a jury if the defendant requests the hearing in juvenile court and expressly waives in writing an indictment, presentment, grand jury investigation and jury trial. In the event the defendant enters a plea of guilty, the juvenile court judge has the same power as the circuit or criminal court in making final disposition of the case.

Reliance by a parent, guardian or custodian upon remedial treatment, other than medical or surgical treatment for a child, when such treatment is legally recognized or legally permitted under the laws of this state, shall not subject such parent, guardian or custodian to any of the penalties hereunder.

Subsection (a) shall not be construed to impose criminal liability upon a mother based solely upon her act of voluntarily delivering a newborn infant to a facility pursuant to § 68-11-255.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 55; 1971, ch. 189, § 6; 1980, ch. 796, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-255; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2001, ch. 388, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Special Project, Family Law in the 1990s — New Problems, Strong Solutions, 46 Vand. L. Rev. 677 (1993).

Collateral References.

Liability of parent for injury to unemancipated child caused by parent's negligence — modern cases. 6 A.L.R.4th 1066.

Who has custody or control of child within terms of penal statute punishing cruelty or neglect by one having custody or control. 75 A.L.R.3d 933.

37-1-158. Contempt of court.

The court may punish a person for contempt of court for disobeying an order of the court or for obstructing or interfering with the proceedings of the court or the enforcement of its orders by imposing a fine or imprisonment as prescribed for circuit, chancery or appellate courts pursuant to title 29, chapter 9.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 57; 1971, ch. 189, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-257.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).